New Mexico, session 2025S1, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1959,
Chapter 329, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read:
"24-5-1. IMMUNIZATION REGULATIONS.--
A. The public health division of the department of
health shall, after consultation with the public education
department and the early childhood education and care
department, promulgate rules governing the immunization SB 3
Page 1

against diseases deemed to be dangerous to the public health,
to be required of children attending licensed child care and
licensed early childhood care programs and public, private,
home or parochial schools in the state. Rules promulgated
pursuant to this subsection shall establish the immunizations
required and the manner and frequency of their administration
in accordance with recommendations from the department of
health or the American academy of pediatrics. The public
health division shall supervise and secure the enforcement of
the required immunization program.
B. The public health division of the department of
health shall promulgate rules governing the immunization
against diseases deemed to be dangerous to the public health,
to be recommended for adults residing in the state. Rules
promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall establish the
immunizations recommended and the recommended manner and
frequency of their administration in accordance with guidance
from the American academy of family physicians, the American
college of obstetricians and gynecologists, the American
college of physicians or the department of health."
SECTION 2. Section 24-5-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1959,
Chapter 329, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read:
"24-5-2. UNLAWFUL TO ENROLL IN SCHOOL OR LICENSED CHILD
CARE PROGRAMS UNIMMUNIZED--UNLAWFUL TO REFUSE TO PERMIT
IMMUNIZATION.--It is unlawful for any child to enroll in SB 3
Page 2

school or a licensed child care or licensed early childhood
care program unless the child has been immunized as required
under the rules of the public health division of the
department of health and can provide satisfactory evidence of
such immunization; provided that, if the child produces
satisfactory evidence of having begun the process of
immunization, the child may enroll and attend school or the
child care program as long as the immunization process is
being accomplished in the prescribed manner. It is unlawful
for any parent to refuse or neglect to have the parent's
child immunized, as required by this section, unless the
child is properly exempted."
SECTION 3. Section 24-5A-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 1) is amended to read:
"24-5A-1. SHORT TITLE.--Chapter 24, Article 5A
NMSA 1978 may be cited as the "Vaccine Purchasing Act"."
SECTION 4. Section 24-5A-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 2) is amended to read:
"24-5A-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Vaccine
Purchasing Act:
A. "department" means the department of health;
B. "fund" means the vaccine purchasing fund;
C. "group health plan" means an employee welfare
benefit plan to the extent that the plan provides medical
care to employees or their dependents under the federal SB 3
Page 3

Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 directly or
through insurance, reimbursement or other means;
D. "health insurance coverage" means benefits
consisting of medical care provided directly or through
insurance or reimbursement or other means under any hospital
or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical
service plan contract or health maintenance organization
contract offered by a health insurance issuer;
E. "health insurer" means any entity subject to
regulation by the office of superintendent that:
(1) provides or is authorized to provide
health insurance or health benefit plans;
(2) administers health insurance or health
benefit coverage; or
(3) otherwise provides a plan of health
insurance or health benefits;
F. "insured child" means a child under the age of
nineteen who is eligible to receive health insurance coverage
from a health insurer or medical care pursuant to a group
health plan;
G. "office of superintendent" means the office of
superintendent of insurance;
H. "policy" means any contract of health insurance
between a health insurer and the insured and all clauses,
riders, endorsements and parts thereof; SB 3
Page 4

I. "provider" means an individual or organization
licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by
law to provide vaccinations to insured children; and
J. "vaccines for children program" means the
federally funded program that provides vaccines at no cost to
eligible children pursuant to Section 1928 of the federal
Social Security Act."
SECTION 5. Section 24-5A-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 3) is amended to read:
"24-5A-3. STATEWIDE VACCINE PURCHASING PROGRAM.--
A. The department shall establish and administer a
statewide vaccine purchasing program to:
(1) expand access to childhood immunizations
recommended by the department pursuant to Section 24-5-1
NMSA 1978;
(2) maintain and improve immunization rates;
(3) facilitate the acquisition by providers
of vaccines for childhood immunizations recommended by the
department pursuant to Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978; and
(4) leverage public and private funding and
resources for the purchase, storage and distribution of
vaccines for childhood immunizations recommended by the
department pursuant to Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978.
B. The department shall:
(1) purchase vaccines for all children in SB 3
Page 5

New Mexico, including children eligible for the vaccines for
children program and insured children;
(2) invoice each health insurer and group
health plan to reimburse the department for the cost of
vaccines provided directly or indirectly by the department to
such health insurer's or group health plan's insured
children;
(3) maintain a list of registered providers
who receive vaccines for insured children that are purchased
by the state and provide such list to each health insurer and
group health plan with every invoice;
(4) report the failure of a health insurer
to reimburse the department within thirty days of the date of
the invoice to the office of superintendent;
(5) report the failure of a health insurer
or group health plan to reimburse the department within
thirty days of the date of the invoice to the state
department of justice for collection; and
(6) credit all receipts collected from
health insurers and group health plans pursuant to the
Vaccine Purchasing Act to the fund.
C. No later than July 1, 2015 and July 1 of each
year thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount to
be expended annually by the department to purchase, store and
distribute vaccines recommended by the department pursuant to SB 3
Page 6

Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978 to all insured children in the
state, including a reserve of ten percent of the amount
estimated.
D. No later than September 1, 2015 and each
quarter thereafter, the department shall invoice each health
insurer and each group health plan for one-fourth of its
proportionate share of the estimated amount and reserve
pursuant to Subsection C of this section, calculated pursuant
to Subsection B of Section 24-5A-6 NMSA 1978.
E. The department may update its estimated amount
to be expended annually and its reserve to take into account
increases or decreases in the cost of vaccines or the costs
of additional vaccines that the department determines should
be included in the statewide vaccine purchasing program and
adjust the amount invoiced to each health insurer and group
health plan the following quarter."
SECTION 6. Section 24-5A-5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 5) is amended to read:
"24-5A-5. AUTHORIZED USES OF THE VACCINE PURCHASING
FUND.--
A. The fund shall be used for the purchase,
storage and distribution of vaccines, as recommended by the
department pursuant to Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978, for insured
children who are not eligible for the vaccines for children
program. SB 3
Page 7

B. The department shall credit any balance
remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year toward
the department's purchase of vaccines the following year;
provided that the department maintains a reserve of ten
percent of the amount estimated to be expended in the
following year.
C. The fund shall not be used:
(1) for the purchase, storage and
distribution of vaccines for children who are eligible for
the vaccines for children program;
(2) for administrative expenses associated
with the statewide vaccine purchasing program; or
(3) to pass through a federally negotiated
discount pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396s."
SECTION 7. Section 59A-18-16.2 NMSA 1978 (being
Laws 2011, Chapter 144, Section 12, as amended) is amended to
read:
"59A-18-16.2. HEALTH INSURANCE OR HEALTH PLAN FORM AND
RATE FILINGS--SUPERINTENDENT--RULEMAKING--COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL LAW.--
A. A small group health plan and a health
insurance issuer or multiple employer welfare arrangement
offering a small group or individual health insurance plan
that provides benefits other than excepted benefits shall:
(1) provide the essential health benefits SB 3
Page 8

defined by the superintendent under Subsection B of this
section;
(2) limit cost sharing for such coverage in
accordance with Subsection D of this section; and
(3) provide coverage without cost sharing
for preventive benefits in accordance with Subsection E of
this section.
B. The superintendent shall define by rule the
essential health benefits package to include at least the
following general categories and the items and services
covered within the categories:
(1) ambulatory patient services;
(2) emergency services;
(3) hospitalization;
(4) maternity and newborn care;
(5) mental health and substance use disorder
services, including behavioral health treatment;
(6) prescription drugs;
(7) rehabilitative and habilitative services
and devices;
(8) laboratory services;
(9) preventive and wellness services and
chronic disease management; and
(10) pediatric services, including oral and
vision care. SB 3
Page 9

C. In defining the essential health benefits
pursuant to Subsection B of this section, the superintendent
shall:
(1) ensure that such essential health
benefits reflect an appropriate balance among the categories
described in that subsection, so that benefits are not unduly
weighted toward any category;
(2) not make coverage decisions, determine
reimbursement rates, establish incentive programs or design
benefits in ways that discriminate against individuals
because of their age, disability or expected length of life;
(3) take into account the health care needs
of diverse segments of the population, including women,
children, persons with disabilities and other groups;
(4) ensure that health benefits established
as essential not be subject to denial to individuals against
their wishes on the basis of the individual's age or expected
length of life or of the individual's present or predicted
disability, degree of medical dependency or quality of life;
(5) provide that if a plan is offered
through the New Mexico health insurance exchange, another
health insurance plan offered through the New Mexico health
insurance exchange shall not fail to be treated as a
qualified health plan solely because the plan does not offer
coverage of benefits offered through the standalone plan that SB 3
Page 10

are otherwise required; and
(6) periodically update the essential health
benefits under Subsection B of this section to address any
gaps in access to coverage or changes in the evidence base
identified by the superintendent.
D. A group health plan and a health insurance
issuer offering a group or individual health insurance plan
shall not establish a restricted lifetime or annual limit on
the dollar value of benefits for any participant or
beneficiary with respect to benefits that are essential
health benefits, as determined by the superintendent. The
provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
prevent a group health plan or health insurance plan from
placing annual or lifetime per-beneficiary limits on specific
covered benefits that are not essential health benefits, to
the extent that these limits are otherwise permitted under
federal or state law.
E. The superintendent shall adopt and promulgate
rules specifying the maximum cost-sharing amounts for which
an insured may be held liable for payment of covered benefits
under any health insurance plan that provides benefits other
than excepted benefits, including deductibles, coinsurance,
copayments or similar charge, and any other expenditure
required of an insured individual with respect to essential
health benefits covered under the plan, but not including SB 3
Page 11

premiums, balance billing amounts for non-network providers
or spending for non-covered services.
F. Any rules that the office of superintendent of
insurance intends to adopt and promulgate pursuant to this
section shall be adopted no later than the first day of
February of the year prior to the first plan year for which
the rules would be effective.
G. A group health plan and a health insurance
issuer offering a group or individual health insurance plan
that provides benefits other than excepted benefits shall
provide coverage for and shall not impose any cost-sharing
requirements for:
(1) items or services that have in effect a
rating of "A" or "B" in the current recommendations of the
United States preventive services task force;
(2) immunizations that have in effect a
recommendation from the department of health, with respect to
the insured for which immunization is considered;
(3) with respect to infants, children and
adolescents, preventive care and screenings provided for in
the comprehensive guidelines supported by the health
resources and services administration of the United States
department of health and human services; and
(4) with respect to women, additional
preventive care and screenings to those described in SB 3
Page 12

Paragraph (1) of this subsection, as provided for in
comprehensive guidelines supported by the health resources
and services administration of the United States department
of health and human services.
H. The provisions of Subsection G of this section
shall not be construed to prohibit a health insurance plan or
health insurance issuer from providing coverage for services
in addition to those recommended by the United States
preventive services task force or to deny coverage for
services that are not described in this section. The
superintendent shall establish by rule a minimum interval
between the date on which a recommendation described in
Paragraphs (1) and (2) of Subsection G of this section or a
guideline under Paragraph (3) of Subsection G of this section
is issued and the plan year with respect to which the
requirement described in Subsection G of this section is
effective with respect to the service described in such
recommendation or guideline; provided that the interval shall
not be less than one year from the date the federal
recommendation or guideline is published.
I. If a health insurance plan is offered as a
qualified health plan through the New Mexico health insurance
exchange, the insurer offering the qualified health plan
shall also offer that plan through the health insurance
exchange as a plan that restricts enrollment to individuals SB 3
Page 13

who, as of the beginning of a plan year, have not attained
the age of twenty-one years.
J. The superintendent shall adopt rules:
(1) to define terms used regarding forms,
rates, reviews and blocks of business that an insurer or
health care plan submits in filing matters;
(2) to govern any additional filing
requirements the superintendent deems appropriate;
(3) to provide notice of hearings and the
grounds on which the hearings have been requested;
(4) to meet criteria for review in
accordance with federal law; and
(5) that the superintendent deems
appropriate to carry out the provisions of Chapter 59A,
Article 18 NMSA 1978.
K. Except as provided by state or federal rule or
law, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
health insurance carrier from appropriately using reasonable
health care cost management techniques.
L. As used in this section, "excepted benefits"
means benefits furnished pursuant to the following:
(1) coverage-only accident or disability
income insurance;
(2) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance; SB 3
Page 14

(3) liability insurance;
(4) workers' compensation or similar
insurance;
(5) automobile medical payment insurance;
(6) credit-only insurance;
(7) coverage for on-site medical clinics;
(8) other similar insurance coverage
specified in regulations under which benefits for medical
care are secondary or incidental to other benefits;
(9) the following benefits if offered
separately:
(a) limited scope dental or vision
benefits;
(b) benefits for long-term care,
nursing home care, home health care, community-based care or
any combination of those benefits; and
(c) other similar limited benefits
specified in regulations;
(10) the following benefits, offered as
independent noncoordinated benefits:
(a) coverage only for a specified
disease or illness; or
(b) hospital indemnity or other fixed
indemnity insurance; and
(11) the following benefits if offered as a SB 3
Page 15

separate insurance policy:
(a) medicare supplemental health
insurance as defined pursuant to Section 1882(g)(1) of the
federal Social Security Act; and
(b) coverage supplemental to the
coverage provided pursuant to Chapter 55 of Title 10 USCA and
similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage pursuant
to a group health plan."
SECTION 8. Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1959,
Chapter 329, Section 1, as amended by Section 1 of this act)
is repealed and a new Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978 is enacted to
read:
"24-5-1. IMMUNIZATION REGULATIONS.--The public health
division of the department of health shall, after
consultation with the public education department, promulgate
rules governing the immunization against diseases deemed to
be dangerous to the public health, to be required of children
attending public, private, home or parochial schools in the
state. The immunizations required and the manner and
frequency of their administration shall conform to
recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization
practices of the United States department of health and human
services and the American academy of pediatrics. The public
health division shall supervise and secure the enforcement of
the required immunization program." SB 3
Page 16

SECTION 9. Section 24-5-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1959,
Chapter 329, Section 2, as amended by Section 2 of this act)
is repealed and a new Section 24-5-2 NMSA 1978 is enacted to
read:
"24-5-2. UNLAWFUL TO ENROLL IN SCHOOL UNIMMUNIZED--
UNLAWFUL TO REFUSE TO PERMIT IMMUNIZATION.--It is unlawful
for any student to enroll in school unless the student has
been immunized as required under the rules of the public
health division of the department of health and can provide
satisfactory evidence of such immunization; provided that, if
the student produces satisfactory evidence of having begun
the process of immunization, the student may enroll and
attend school as long as the immunization process is being
accomplished in the prescribed manner. It is unlawful for
any parent to refuse or neglect to have the parent's child
immunized, as required by this section, unless the child is
properly exempted."
SECTION 10. Section 24-5A-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 2, as amended by Section 4 of this act) is
repealed and a new Section 24-5A-2 NMSA 1978 is enacted to
read:
"24-5A-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Vaccine
Purchasing Act:
A. "advisory committee on immunization practices"
means the group of medical and public health experts that SB 3
Page 17

develops recommendations on how to use vaccines to control
diseases in the United States, established under Section 222
of the federal Public Health Service Act;
B. "department" means the department of health;
C. "fund" means the vaccine purchasing fund;
D. "group health plan" means an employee welfare
benefit plan to the extent that the plan provides medical
care to employees or their dependents under the federal
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 directly or
through insurance, reimbursement or other means;
E. "health insurance coverage" means benefits
consisting of medical care provided directly or through
insurance or reimbursement or other means under any hospital
or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical
service plan contract or health maintenance organization
contract offered by a health insurance issuer;
F. "health insurer" means any entity subject to
regulation by the office of superintendent that:
(1) provides or is authorized to provide
health insurance or health benefit plans;
(2) administers health insurance or health
benefit coverage; or
(3) otherwise provides a plan of health
insurance or health benefits;
G. "insured child" means a child under the age of SB 3
Page 18

nineteen who is eligible to receive health insurance coverage
from a health insurer or medical care pursuant to a group
health plan;
H. "office of superintendent" means the office of
superintendent of insurance;
I. "policy" means any contract of health insurance
between a health insurer and the insured and all clauses,
riders, endorsements and parts thereof;
J. "provider" means an individual or organization
licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by
law to provide vaccinations to insured children; and
K. "vaccines for children program" means the
federally funded program that provides vaccines at no cost to
eligible children pursuant to Section 1928 of the federal
Social Security Act."
SECTION 11. Section 24-5A-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 3, as amended by Section 5 of this act) is
repealed and a new Section 24-5A-3 NMSA 1978 is enacted to
read:
"24-5A-3. STATEWIDE VACCINE PURCHASING PROGRAM.--
A. The department shall establish and administer a
statewide vaccine purchasing program to:
(1) expand access to childhood immunizations
recommended by the advisory committee on immunization
practices; SB 3
Page 19

(2) maintain and improve immunization rates;
(3) facilitate the acquisition by providers
of vaccines for childhood immunizations recommended by the
advisory committee on immunization practices; and
(4) leverage public and private funding and
resources for the purchase, storage and distribution of
vaccines for childhood immunizations recommended by the
advisory committee on immunization practices.
B. The department shall:
(1) purchase vaccines for all children in
New Mexico, including children eligible for the vaccines for
children program and insured children;
(2) invoice each health insurer and group
health plan to reimburse the department for the cost of
vaccines provided directly or indirectly by the department to
such health insurer's or group health plan's insured
children;
(3) maintain a list of registered providers
who receive vaccines for insured children that are purchased
by the state and provide such list to each health insurer and
group health plan with every invoice;
(4) report the failure of a health insurer
to reimburse the department within thirty days of the date of
the invoice to the office of superintendent;
(5) report the failure of a health insurer SB 3
Page 20

or group health plan to reimburse the department within
thirty days of the date of the invoice to the state
department of justice for collection; and
(6) credit all receipts collected from
health insurers and group health plans pursuant to the
Vaccine Purchasing Act to the fund.
C. No later than July 1, 2015 and July 1 of each
year thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount to
be expended annually by the department to purchase, store and
distribute vaccines recommended by the advisory committee on
immunization practices to all insured children in the state,
including a reserve of ten percent of the amount estimated.
D. No later than September 1, 2015 and each
quarter thereafter, the department shall invoice each health
insurer and each group health plan for one-fourth of its
proportionate share of the estimated amount and reserve
pursuant to Subsection C of this section, calculated pursuant
to Subsection B of Section 24-5A-6 NMSA 1978.
E. The department may update its estimated amount
to be expended annually and its reserve to take into account
increases or decreases in the cost of vaccines or the costs
of additional vaccines that the department determines should
be included in the statewide vaccine purchasing program and
adjust the amount invoiced to each health insurer and group
health plan the following quarter." SB 3
Page 21

SECTION 12. Section 24-5A-5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2015,
Chapter 5, Section 5, as amended by Section 6 of this act) is
repealed and a new Section 24-5A-5 NMSA 1978 is enacted to
read:
"24-5A-5. AUTHORIZED USES OF THE VACCINE PURCHASING
FUND.--
A. The fund shall be used for the purchase,
storage and distribution of vaccines, as recommended by the
advisory committee on immunization practices, for insured
children who are not eligible for the vaccines for children
program.
B. The department shall credit any balance
remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year toward
the department's purchase of vaccines the following year;
provided that the department maintains a reserve of ten
percent of the amount estimated to be expended in the
following year.
C. The fund shall not be used:
(1) for the purchase, storage and
distribution of vaccines for children who are eligible for
the vaccines for children program;
(2) for administrative expenses associated
with the statewide vaccine purchasing program; or
(3) to pass through a federally negotiated
discount pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396s." SB 3
Page 22

SECTION 13. Section 59A-18-16.2 NMSA 1978 (being
Laws 2011, Chapter 144, Section 12, as amended by Section 7
of this act) is repealed and a new Section 59A-18-16.2
NMSA 1978 is enacted to read:
"59A-18-16.2. HEALTH INSURANCE OR HEALTH PLAN FORM AND
RATE FILINGS--SUPERINTENDENT--RULEMAKING--COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL LAW.--
A. A small group health plan and a health
insurance issuer or multiple employer welfare arrangement
offering a small group or individual health insurance plan
that provides benefits other than excepted benefits shall:
(1) provide the essential health benefits
defined by the superintendent under Subsection B of this
section;
(2) limit cost sharing for such coverage in
accordance with Subsection D of this section; and
(3) provide coverage without cost sharing
for preventive benefits in accordance with Subsection E of
this section.
B. The superintendent shall define by rule the
essential health benefits package to include at least the
following general categories and the items and services
covered within the categories:
(1) ambulatory patient services;
(2) emergency services; SB 3
Page 23

(3) hospitalization;
(4) maternity and newborn care;
(5) mental health and substance use disorder
services, including behavioral health treatment;
(6) prescription drugs;
(7) rehabilitative and habilitative services
and devices;
(8) laboratory services;
(9) preventive and wellness services and
chronic disease management; and
(10) pediatric services, including oral and
vision care.
C. In defining the essential health benefits
pursuant to Subsection B of this section, the superintendent
shall:
(1) ensure that such essential health
benefits reflect an appropriate balance among the categories
described in that subsection, so that benefits are not unduly
weighted toward any category;
(2) not make coverage decisions, determine
reimbursement rates, establish incentive programs or design
benefits in ways that discriminate against individuals
because of their age, disability or expected length of life;
(3) take into account the health care needs
of diverse segments of the population, including women, SB 3
Page 24

children, persons with disabilities and other groups;
(4) ensure that health benefits established
as essential not be subject to denial to individuals against
their wishes on the basis of the individual's age or expected
length of life or of the individual's present or predicted
disability, degree of medical dependency or quality of life;
(5) provide that if a plan is offered
through the New Mexico health insurance exchange, another
health insurance plan offered through the New Mexico health
insurance exchange shall not fail to be treated as a
qualified health plan solely because the plan does not offer
coverage of benefits offered through the standalone plan that
are otherwise required; and
(6) periodically update the essential health
benefits under Subsection B of this section to address any
gaps in access to coverage or changes in the evidence base
identified by the superintendent.
D. A group health plan and a health insurance
issuer offering a group or individual health insurance plan
shall not establish a restricted lifetime or annual limit on
the dollar value of benefits for any participant or
beneficiary with respect to benefits that are essential
health benefits, as determined by the superintendent. The
provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
prevent a group health plan or health insurance plan from SB 3
Page 25

placing annual or lifetime per-beneficiary limits on specific
covered benefits that are not essential health benefits, to
the extent that these limits are otherwise permitted under
federal or state law.
E. The superintendent shall adopt and promulgate
rules specifying the maximum cost-sharing amounts for which
an insured may be held liable for payment of covered benefits
under any health insurance plan that provides benefits other
than excepted benefits, including deductibles, coinsurance,
copayments or similar charge, and any other expenditure
required of an insured individual with respect to essential
health benefits covered under the plan, but not including
premiums, balance billing amounts for non-network providers
or spending for non-covered services.
F. Any rules that the office of superintendent of
insurance intends to adopt and promulgate pursuant to this
section shall be adopted no later than the first day of
February of the year prior to the first plan year for which
the rules would be effective.
G. A group health plan and a health insurance
issuer offering a group or individual health insurance plan
that provides benefits other than excepted benefits shall
provide coverage for and shall not impose any cost-sharing
requirements for:
(1) items or services that have in effect a SB 3
Page 26

rating of "A" or "B" in the current recommendations of the
United States preventive services task force;
(2) immunizations that have in effect a
recommendation from the advisory committee on immunization
practices of the federal centers for disease control and
prevention, with respect to the insured for which
immunization is considered;
(3) with respect to infants, children and
adolescents, preventive care and screenings provided for in
the comprehensive guidelines supported by the health
resources and services administration of the United States
department of health and human services; and
(4) with respect to women, additional
preventive care and screenings to those described in
Paragraph (1) of this subsection, as provided for in
comprehensive guidelines supported by the health resources
and services administration of the United States department
of health and human services.
H. The provisions of Subsection G of this section
shall not be construed to prohibit a health insurance plan or
health insurance issuer from providing coverage for services
in addition to those recommended by the United States
preventive services task force or to deny coverage for
services that are not described in this section. The
superintendent shall establish by rule a minimum interval SB 3
Page 27

between the date on which a recommendation described in
Paragraphs (1) and (2) of Subsection G of this section or a
guideline under Paragraph (3) of Subsection G of this section
is issued and the plan year with respect to which the
requirement described in Subsection G of this section is
effective with respect to the service described in such
recommendation or guideline; provided that the interval shall
not be less than one year from the date the federal
recommendation or guideline is published.
I. If a health insurance plan is offered as a
qualified health plan through the New Mexico health insurance
exchange, the insurer offering the qualified health plan
shall also offer that plan through the health insurance
exchange as a plan that restricts enrollment to individuals
who, as of the beginning of a plan year, have not attained
the age of twenty-one years.
J. The superintendent shall adopt rules:
(1) to define terms used regarding forms,
rates, reviews and blocks of business that an insurer or
health care plan submits in filing matters;
(2) to govern any additional filing
requirements the superintendent deems appropriate;
(3) to provide notice of hearings and the
grounds on which the hearings have been requested;
(4) to meet criteria for review in SB 3
Page 28

accordance with federal law; and
(5) that the superintendent deems
appropriate to carry out the provisions of Chapter 59A,
Article 18 NMSA 1978.
K. Except as provided by state or federal rule or
law, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
health insurance carrier from appropriately using reasonable
health care cost management techniques.
L. As used in this section, "excepted benefits"
means benefits furnished pursuant to the following:
(1) coverage-only accident or disability
income insurance;
(2) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(3) liability insurance;
(4) workers' compensation or similar
insurance;
(5) automobile medical payment insurance;
(6) credit-only insurance;
(7) coverage for on-site medical clinics;
(8) other similar insurance coverage
specified in regulations under which benefits for medical
care are secondary or incidental to other benefits;
(9) the following benefits if offered
separately: SB 3
Page 29

(a) limited scope dental or vision
benefits;
(b) benefits for long-term care,
nursing home care, home health care, community-based care or
any combination of those benefits; and
(c) other similar limited benefits
specified in regulations;
(10) the following benefits, offered as
independent noncoordinated benefits:
(a) coverage only for a specified
disease or illness; or
(b) hospital indemnity or other fixed
indemnity insurance; and
(11) the following benefits if offered as a
separate insurance policy:
(a) medicare supplemental health
insurance as defined pursuant to Section 1882(g)(1) of the
federal Social Security Act; and
(b) coverage supplemental to the
coverage provided pursuant to Chapter 55 of Title 10 USCA and
similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage pursuant
to a group health plan."
SECTION 14. DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE.--The provisions
of Sections 8 through 13 of this act are effective
July 1, 2026. SB 3
Page 30